California statutes. Public Resources Code
Bonds in the total amount of two billion ninety-one million three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($2,091,375,000), excluding the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 5096.370, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes set forth in Section 5096.310 and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall constitute a valid and binding obligation of the state, and the full faith and credit of the state is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable. Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection (the Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Finance Committee created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.362 at any different times that are necessary to service expenditures appropriated pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 255, Sec. 19.   (AB 184)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.361.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.362.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection (Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this chapter, the Safe Neighborhood Parks, Clean Water, Clean Air, and Coastal Protection
 (Villaraigosa-Keeley Act) Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Treasurer, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the secretary is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 15.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.363.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter to carry out Section 5096.310 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.364.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds maturing each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.365.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 5096.366, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.366.

For purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amount withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this
 chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.367.

Pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the cost of bond issuance shall be paid out of the bond proceeds. These costs shall be shared proportionally by each program funded through this bond act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.367.5.

Actual costs incurred in connection with administering programs authorized under the categories specified in Section 5096.310 shall be paid from the funds authorized by this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.368.

The secretary may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, including other authorized forms of interim financing that include, but are not limited to, commercial paper, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by
 resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The secretary shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 16.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: Pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 638, Sec. 17, this section was submitted in Prop. 12 in place of the section proposed by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.369.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.370.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state of the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.371.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or
 earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.372.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(b) Funds provided pursuant to this chapter, and any appropriation or
 transfer of those funds, shall not be deemed to be a transfer of funds for the purposes of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2780) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 12 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.693. Camp Pendleton Marine Base [5096.400. - 5096.400.]

5096.400.

To the extent permitted by federal law, if the Camp Pendleton Marine Base in the County of San Diego ceases to be used as a federal facility, it shall be converted to an open-space area or greenbelt that shall be administered by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.695. Public Review of State Agency Acquisition of Conservation Lands [5096.500. - 5096.520.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5096.500. - 5096.501.]

5096.500.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) It is vital to ensure public confidence in amounts paid, and procedures used, for the acquisition of property by state agencies that spend taxpayer or bond funds.

(b) It is important to ensure that an acquisition agency act expeditiously to purchase critically needed conservation lands for their preservation and protection.

(c) The purpose of this chapter is to ensure that information on the acquisition of conservation lands by state agencies is made available to the public, while ensuring that these lands continue to be acquired in an efficient and expeditious manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.501.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Acquisition agency” means the Wildlife Conservation Board, the Department of Parks and Recreation, or a state conservancy.

(b) “Conservation lands” means any land or interest therein to be acquired by an acquisition agency, or that is owned by the state.

(c) “Major acquisition” means an acquisition for which
 one or more agencies propose to spend more than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) of state funds.

(d) “Project partner” means a public agency or nonprofit organization that is seeking state funding for itself or for another public agency or nonprofit organization, from an acquisition agency for the acquisition of conservation lands.

(e) “Specialty interests” means those partial property interests that may exist on a property and that can require specialized knowledge and experience to value, including, but not limited to, timber, water, minerals, or carbon credits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (SB 1266)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conservation Lands Acquisition Procedures [5096.510. - 5096.518.]

5096.510.

(a) (1) If more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) of state funds are proposed for expenditure or grant by an acquisition agency of conservation lands, the acquisition agency or the project partner shall contract for an independent appraisal of the land in compliance with this section.

(2) The project partner or landowner may contribute to the costs of the appraisal, be identified as an intended user of the appraisal, and be named as the coclient of the appraiser or firm preparing the appraisal. However, on and after January 1,
 2015, a landowner shall not be named as a coclient of the appraiser or firm preparing the appraisal.

(b) The appraisal shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The appraisal shall meet all applicable requirements of this chapter and any other applicable state laws and policies, and shall conform to Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

(2) The appraisal shall not involve a fee based on a percentage of the property’s appraised value or the allowed deduction.

(3) The appraisal shall not be prepared by an appraiser that has a financial interest in the property being appraised, including, but not limited to, being the seller or donor, a party to
 the seller’s acquisition of the property, or employed by or related to any of the above.

(c) The acquisition agency or project partner that contracts for the appraisal shall select an appraiser that is qualified to appraise the specific property based upon verifiable education, experience, and knowledge of appropriate methodologies, techniques, and the real estate market relevant to the specific property. The following requirements shall also apply:

(1) If the project to be appraised is a conservation easement, the appraiser’s education shall include advanced-level educational courses or certifications in the valuation of conservation easements.

(2) If the project to be appraised includes more than nominal value
 for specialty interests, the acquisition agency or project partner that contracts for the appraisal shall include provisions in the contract that effectuate the following, as applicable:

(A) The professional valuing the specialty interest shall comply with the requirements of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 5096.517.

(B) The professional valuing the specialty interests shall be qualified to appraise the specific specialty interests based upon verifiable education, experience, and knowledge of appropriate methodologies, techniques, and the markets relevant to the specific specialty interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 394, Sec. 2.   (SB 1266)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.512.

(a) In addition to the review by the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 1348.2 of the Fish and Game Code, the appraisal prepared for a major acquisition of land shall be reviewed by a qualified independent appraiser retained by the acquisition agency for this purpose, and who meets the following conditions:

(1) The review appraiser did not conduct the appraisal pursuant to Section 5096.510 and has no financial interest in the major acquisition.

(2) The review appraiser is licensed pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) The review appraiser shall review the appraisal and prepare an appraisal review report, in a narrative format, that does all of the following:

(1) Summarizes the appraisal.

(2) States the basis on which the value of the land was established.

(3) Describes the standards used to prepare the appraisal.

(4) Determines whether or not the appraisal meets the standards established under the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

(c) The appraisal review report need not include any proprietary information provided by or on
 behalf of the seller or that is otherwise exempt from public disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) (1) If a major acquisition of conservation lands will be approved by more than one acquisition agency and each acquisition agency complies with paragraph (2), not more than one independent appraisal is required pursuant to Section 5096.510, and not more than one appraisal review report is required pursuant to this section.

(2) Paragraph (1) is applicable if each acquisition agency does all of the following:

(A) Utilizes the independent appraisal and appraisal review report, as required by this
 chapter.

(B) Makes an independent determination of whether to approve the major acquisition of conservation lands.

(C) Complies with all of the public disclosure and independent review requirements of this chapter.

(e) An acquisition agency shall not utilize property acreage as a categorical threshold to impose an independent review of an appraisal pursuant to this section. However, this prohibition does not prohibit an agency from otherwise considering possible impacts from the acquisition of a large acreage property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 373.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.513.

Not less than 30 calendar days prior to holding a public hearing for the purpose of authorizing a major acquisition of conservation lands, an acquisition agency shall make available for public review information, except information that is exempt from being disclosed pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A copy of the independent appraisal review prepared pursuant to Section 5096.512.

(b) A summary of the basis for the recommendation of approval for
 the major acquisition of the land made by the acquisition agency.

(c) Any relevant environmental studies, documents, or other information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 374.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.514.

Not more than 10 working days after the close of escrow for a major acquisition of conservation land by an acquisition agency, the acquisition agency shall make available to the public all of the following information, unless it is exempt from being disclosed pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code):

(a) A copy of the appraisal for the conservation land approved by the Department of General Services, and from which fair market value was determined.

(b) A copy of all other documents relevant to the purchase of the conservation land, including, but not limited to, environmental assessments or other documents not already disclosed pursuant to Section 5096.513.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 568.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.515.

The procedures and requirements established pursuant to this chapter are in addition to, and do not amend, modify, or supplant, any procedures or requirements established pursuant to the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Act of 2002 (Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 79500) of the Water Code) or the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Act of 2002 (Chapter 1.696 (commencing with Section 5096.600)), for the acquisition of conservation lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.516.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), conservation lands may not be sold to another owner, or have possession and control transferred to another agency, unless all of the following occur:

(1) The selling or transferring agency prepares and makes available to the public a detailed report that identifies why the conservation lands no longer serve a needed conservation purpose.

(2) The selling or transferring agency holds a duly noticed public hearing to accept public comment on the proposed sale or transfer of conservation lands.

(3) After compliance with paragraphs (1) and (2), the selling or transferring agency finds, based on substantial evidence, that the property no longer serves a needed conservation purpose.

(4) The sale or transfer of the land is authorized or approved as part of the annual Budget Act or pursuant to specific legislation authorizing the sale or transfer.

(b) Proceeds from the sale or transfer of conservation lands shall be used solely for one or more of the following purposes:

(1) The acquisition of conservation lands to achieve the same or equivalent objectives as the original acquisition of the property that was sold or transferred.

(2) To further the purposes of Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000).

(3) The acquisition of wildlife habitat to further the purposes of the Wildlife Conservation Law of 1947 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).

(4) The acquisition of wildlife habitat to further the purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1410) of Chapter 4.3 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(c) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) The sale or transfer of conservation lands solely for the purpose of boundary adjustments or consolidation of property ownership.

(2) The sale or transfer of lands subject to a conservation easement to keep lands in agricultural production.

(3) The sale or transfer to other public agencies or nonprofit organizations to improve conservation management, public access, historic preservation, or to protect or enhance the biological value of conservation lands.

(4) The sale or transfer of conservation lands by the State Coastal Conservancy when the sale or transfer of interests in land is provided for, consistent with Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000), at the time of acquisition of real property.

(5) The exchange of conservation lands for land of greater biological value as wildlife habitat.

(6) The sale or transfer of conservation lands that have a fair market value of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(d) The requirements imposed by this section are in addition to any other requirements imposed by law or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 708, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.517.

(a) In addition to any other requirements or standards prescribed by law, appraisal reports prepared for the acquisition of any land or interest therein by or with funding from an “acquisition agency,” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5096.501, shall include all of the following to be considered for appraisal review by the state:

(1) A collection of descriptive photographs and maps of sufficient quality and detail to clearly depict the subject property and any market data relied upon, including the relationship between the location of the subject property and the market data.

(2) A complete
 description of the subject property land, site characteristics, and improvements. Valuations based on a property’s development potential shall include:

(A) Verifiable data on the development potential of the land.

(B) A description of what would be required for a development project to proceed, such as legal entitlements, and infrastructure needs.

(C) Presentation of evidence that sufficient demand exists, or is likely to exist in the future, to provide market support for the development.

(3) A statement by the appraiser indicating to what extent land title conditions were investigated and considered in the analysis and value conclusion. The appraisal
 shall also include a preliminary title report when such a report is available.

(4) A discussion of implied dedication, prescriptive rights, or other unrecorded rights as described in Sections 801 to 813, inclusive, and Sections 1006 to 1009, inclusive, of the Civil Code, that may affect value, indicating the extent of investigation and any knowledge or observation of conditions that might indicate evidence of public use. If the appraiser has no knowledge of, or has not observed, those conditions, a statement to that effect shall be included in the appraisal report.

(5) An appraisal report that includes more
 than nominal value for specialty interests, including, but not limited to, timber, water, minerals, or carbon credits, shall include a separate valuation prepared and signed by a certified or registered professional qualified in the field of specialty interest. This valuation shall be reviewed and approved by a second qualified, certified or registered professional, considered by the appraiser, and appended to the appraisal report.

(b) Each appraisal report shall be prepared by, and include a signature by an appropriately licensed or certified real estate appraiser in good standing pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, and its implementing regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 394, Sec. 6.   (SB 1266)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.518.

For a charitable contribution claimed by a seller that is over five thousand dollars ($5,000) on conservation lands acquired using state funds, in order to substantiate the amount of the charitable contribution deduction claimed by the seller pursuant to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, both of the following requirements shall apply:

(a) The seller shall attach to his or her California income tax return a copy of the appraisal of the charitable contribution relied on by the acquisition agency.

(b) The appraisal attached to the return shall be prepared by an appraiser licensed by the
 Office of Real Estate Appraisers pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code and shall comply with the applicable requirements of the Revenue and Taxation Code and the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of substantiating the amount of the contribution for California income and franchise tax purposes and federal income tax purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 208, Sec. 5.   (SB 833)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conservation Easement Registry [5096.520. - 5096.520.]

5096.520.

(a) The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall establish a central public registry of all conservation easements held or required by the state, or purchased with state grant funds provided by an agency, department, or division of the state on or after January 1, 2000. In constructing the registry, the Resources Agency shall draw upon the Department of General Services’ property inventory, and other information held by a state agency, department, division, or other sources.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “conservation easement” means any limitation in a recorded instrument that contains an easement, restriction, covenant, condition, or offer to dedicate, that has been executed by or on behalf of the owner of the land subject to that limitation and is binding upon successive owners of the land, and the purpose of which is to retain land predominantly in its natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition. “Conservation easement” includes a conservation easement as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code, an open-space easement as defined in Section 51075 of the Government Code, and an agricultural conservation easement as defined in Section 10211.

(c) The registry shall only include the following information on each conservation easement listed in the registry:

(1) The assessor’s parcel numbers for the property covered by the easement.

(2) The purpose of the easement.

(3) The location of the easement, identified by county and nearest city.

(4) The identity of the easementholder.

(5) The size of the easement in acres.

(6) The date the easement transaction was recorded.

(7) The amount of funding provided by the agency, department, or division of the state holding or requiring the easement or providing state grant funds for the easement.

(d) An agency, department, or division of the state with conservation easements that are held or required by the state or purchased with state grant funds shall enter and keep current the information specified in subdivision (c) for those easements in the registry established pursuant to this section.

(e) On or before January 1, 2009, the Secretary of the Resources Agency shall make the registry available for use by the general public. Only the information pertaining to paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (c) regarding conservation easements held or required by the state, or purchased with state grant funds provided by an agency, department, or division of the state on or after January 1, 2006, shall be provided by the Secretary of the Resources Agency on the Internet. Personal identifying information shall not be posted on the Internet. The registry shall be updated biennially.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 229, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.696. The California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Act of 2002 [5096.600. - 5096.683.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5096.600. - 5096.606.]

5096.600.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Act of 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.601.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) To maintain a high quality of life for California’s growing population requires a continuing investment in parks, recreation facilities, and in the protection of the state’s natural and historical resources.

(b) Clean air, clean water, clean beaches, and healthy natural ecosystems that can support both human communities and the state’s native fish and wildlife are all part of the legacy of California. Each generation has an obligation to be good stewards of these resources in order to pass them on to their children.

(c) California’s historical legacy also requires active protection, restoration, and interpretation to preserve and pass on an understanding and appreciation of the diverse cultural influences and extraordinary human achievements that have contributed to the unique development of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.605.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Acquisition” means obtaining the fee title or a lesser interest in real property, including specifically, a conservation easement or development rights.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(c) “Development” includes, but is not limited to, improvement, rehabilitation, restoration, enhancement, preservation, protection, and interpretation.

(d) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(e) “District” means any regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3, any recreation and park district formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780), or an authority formed pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100). With respect to any community or unincorporated region that is not included within a district, and in which no city or county provides parks or recreational areas or facilities, “district” also means any other district that is authorized by statute to operate and manage parks or recreational areas or facilities, employs a full-time park and recreation director, offers year-round park and recreation services on lands and facilities owned by the district, and allocates a substantial portion of its annual operating budget to parks or recreation areas or facilities.

(f) “Fund” means the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Fund created pursuant to Section 5096.610.

(g) “Historical resource” includes, but is not limited to, any building, structure, site, area, place, artifact, or collection of artifacts that is historically or archaeologically significant in the cultural annals of California.

(h) “Local conservation corps” means a program operated by a public agency or nonprofit organization that is certified pursuant to Section 14406.

(i) “Nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit public benefit corporation formed pursuant to the Nonprofit Corporation Law (commencing with Section 5000 of the Corporations Code), qualified to do business in California, and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(j) “Preservation” means identification, evaluation, recordation, documentation, interpretation, protection, rehabilitation, restoration, stabilization, development, and reconstruction, or any combination of those activities.

(k) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.606.

Lands or interests in land acquired with funds allocated pursuant to this chapter shall be acquired from a willing seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Act of 2002 [5096.610. - 5096.611.]

5096.610.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the California Clean Water, Clean Air, Safe Neighborhood Parks, and Coastal Protection Fund, which is hereby created. Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 5096.650, the money in the fund shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature, in the manner set forth in this chapter, for acquisition and development projects, in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The sum of two hundred twenty-five million dollars ($225,000,000) for acquisition and development of the state park system.

(b) The sum of eight hundred thirty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($832,500,000) for local assistance programs for the acquisition and development of neighborhood, community, and regional parks and recreation areas.

(c) The sum of one billion two hundred seventy-five million dollars ($1,275,000,000) for land, air, and water conservation programs, including acquisition for those purposes.

(d) The sum of two hundred sixty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($267,500,000) for the acquisition, restoration, preservation, and interpretation of California’s historical and cultural resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.611.

Notwithstanding any other law, two million five hundred fifty-seven thousand dollars ($2,557,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 5096.610, and eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5096.652 from the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5096.610 are reallocated to finance the purposes of, and shall be authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with, Division 45 (commencing with Section 80000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Parks [5096.615. - 5096.615.]

5096.615.

The two hundred twenty-five million dollars ($225,000,000) allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5096.610 shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature to the department for the acquisition and development of the state park system. It is the intent of the Legislature that first priority for funding shall be for development projects to complete and expand visitor facilities and for restoration projects. Not more than 50 percent of the funds provided by this section may be used for acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Local Assistance Programs [5096.620. - 5096.634.]

5096.620.

The eight hundred thirty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($832,500,000) allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5096.610 shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature for local assistance programs, in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The sum of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) to the department for grants, in accordance with Section 5096.621, and on the basis of population, for the acquisition and development of neighborhood, community, and regional parks and recreation lands and facilities in urban and rural areas.

(b) The sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) to the department for grants, in accordance with the Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620)).

(c) The sum of twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($22,500,000) on a per capita basis in accordance with subdivision (g) of Section 5096.621.

(d) The sum of two hundred sixty million dollars ($260,000,000) to the department for grants for urban and special need park programs in accordance with Section 5096.625.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 40 at the March 5, 2002, election.   Note: See Stats. 2001, Ch. 878, Sec. 1, relating to expenditure of funds allocated pursuant to subd. (d) of this section.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.621.
